Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1117.02
Computer file data; release prohibited; written approval for release excepted; public records excepted.

(1) Neither the information management services administrator, the Chief Information Officer, nor any employee of such administrator or officer shall release or permit the release of any data maintained in computer files to any person or persons without the express written approval of both the agency primarily responsible for collection and maintenance of such data and the employee to whom such data pertains, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Any data which is a public record in its original form shall remain a public record when maintained in computer files and shall be provided to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst pursuant to section 50-420 and shall be made available to the Auditor of Public Accounts solely for use in the performance of audits prescribed by law.

Laws 1975, LB 472, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 414, § 4;

Laws 1979, LB 193, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 38;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 5.